Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10D-642] Prohibited uses of
senior-specific certifications and professional designations. (a) It is
an unfair and deceptive act or practice in the business of insurance within the
meaning of article 13 for an insurance producer to use a senior-specific
certification or professional designation that indicates or implies in such a
way as to mislead a purchaser or prospective purchaser that the insurance
producer has a special certification or training in advising or servicing
seniors in connection with the solicitation, sale, or purchase of a life
insurance or annuity product or in providing advice as to the value of or the
advisability of purchasing or selling a life insurance or annuity product
either directly or indirectly through publications or writings or by issuing or
promulgating analyses or reports related to a life insurance or annuity
product.

(b) The prohibited use of senior-specific
certifications or professional designations includes the following:

(1) Use of a certification or professional
designation by an insurance producer who has not actually earned or is
otherwise ineligible to use the certification or designation;

(2) Use of a non-existent, false, or self-conferred
certification or professional designation;

(3) Use of a certification or professional
designation that indicates or implies a level of occupational qualifications
obtained through education, training, or experience that the insurance producer
using the certification or designation does not have; and

(4) Use of a certification or professional
designation that was obtained from a certifying or designating organization
that:

(A) Is primarily engaged in the business of
instruction in sales or marketing;

(B) Does not have reasonable standards or
procedures for assuring the competency of its certificants or designees;

(C) Does not have reasonable standards or
procedures for monitoring and penalizing its certificants or designees for
improper or unethical conduct; or

(D) Does not have reasonable continuing
education requirements for its certificants or designees to maintain the
certificate or designation.

(c) There is a rebuttable presumption that a
certifying or designating organization is not disqualified for purposes of
subsection (b) when the certification or designation issued from the
organization does not primarily apply to sales or marketing and when the
organization or the certification or designation in question has been
accredited by:

(1) The American National Standards Institute;

(2) The National Commission for Certifying Agencies;
or

(3) Any organization that is on the United States
Department of Education's list entitled "Accrediting Agencies Recognized
for Title IV Purposes".

(d) In determining whether a combination of
words or an acronym standing for a combination of words constitutes a
certification or professional designation indicating or implying that a person
has special certification or training in advising or servicing seniors, factors
to be considered shall include:

(1) Use of one or more words such as
"senior", "retirement", "elder", or like words
combined with one or more words such as "certified",
"registered", "chartered", "adviser",
"specialist", "consultant", "planner", or like
words, in the name of the certification or professional designation; and

(2) The manner in which those words are combined.

(e) For purposes of this section, a job title
within an organization that is licensed or registered by a state or federal
financial services regulatory agency is not a certification or professional
designation unless it is used in a manner that would confuse or mislead a
reasonable consumer when the job title:

(1) Indicates seniority or standing within the
organization; or

(2) Specifies an individual's area of specialization
within the organization. [L 2011, c 108, pt of §7]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next